Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5876.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 30-14 of the General Laws entitled "General Provisions" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
30-14-7. Protecting Rhode Island against the use of nuclear weapons.
(a) Short title. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Safeguard Rhode Island
against the use of nuclear weapons act".
(b) A special legislative commission is hereby established, consisting of eleven (11)
members, all of whom shall be United States citizens who are residents of Rhode Island, and who
credibly reflect the makeup of the state's population with respect to gender, cultural, and ancestral
background and who shall have publicly applied for membership on the commission; one of whom
shall be appointed by the speaker of the house, one of whom shall be appointed by the president of
the senate; one of whom shall be appointed by the attorney general; and eight (8) of whom shall be
appointed by the secretary of state in consultation with the governor.
(c) The application to serve on the special commission shall include:
(1) The intent of the applicant to advance the investigation established by this section;
(2) The city or town in which the applicant resides;
(3) The employment or retirement status of the applicant; and
(4) The applicant's interest in serving on the commission and their view of why they might
make an important contribution to the work of the commission.
(d) The governor shall post the appointment opportunity on the official website of the state

within thirty (30) days of the passage of this section, and all applications for service on the
commission shall be submitted within thirty (30) days of the posting of the appointment
opportunity. All appointments to the commission shall be made no sooner than ninety (90) days
nor later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the passage of this act.
(e) The purpose of the special legislative commission shall be to investigate and report on
what measures may be necessary and appropriate to protect the environment, wildlife, culture, and
population of Rhode Island from the existential threat posed by nuclear weapons and to contribute
toward the total elimination of these weapons under multi-lateral negotiation per the auspices of
the 1970 Non-Proliferation Treaty; the 2010 New Start Treaty; and the 2021 Treaty on the
Prohibition of Nuclear Weapons as provided for in Article 4 of said treaty. Topics to be addressed
by the commission shall include, but not be limited to, the harms posed to Rhode Island by nuclear
weapons such as:
(1) Physical destruction from explosions, fire, and radioactive contamination;
(2) Infrastructure collapse including roads, bridges, electricity, and telecommunication;
(3) Disruption of essential services such as food and fuel supply, financial systems,
healthcare services, and housing;
(4) Environmental devastation, including the loss of natural resources, ecosystems, and
biodiversity;
(5) Severe harm to the physical and mental well-being of Rhode Island residents; and
(6) Severe disruptions to Rhode Island from a nuclear attack on a nearby city or state (i.e.,
New York or Boston) including radiation poisoning to organisms and water supplies, electrical
blackouts, food supply interruptions, etc.
(e)(1) The commission's deliberations shall also touch on the probable inability of
preventing the single, first use of a nuclear weapon from escalating into full-scale war; and the
scientifically validated danger of a years-long "nuclear winter" which would follow such a war and
would limit the growth of crops and lead to widespread human starvation.
(2) The commission shall also investigate measures and make recommendations to the
government and people of Rhode Island including, but not limited to, financial, legislative, or legal
measures to assist or encourage transition from nuclear weapons-related employment and
commercial activities within the state to jobs and activities that instead addresses the climate crisis
and other pressing social needs such as health care, housing, education, and elimination of poverty
and discrimination.
(f) No later than thirty (30) days after appointment of the final member of the commission,
the members shall meet and organize and shall elect co-chairpersons by majority vote. The
LC001950 - Page 2 of 4

commission shall use procedures and decision-making per the currently in force rules of the Rhode
Island senate. The commission's proceedings, meetings, and activities shall be subject to chapter
46 of title 42. ("open meetings").
(g) The commission shall meet on a regular basis to research, gather evidence, and hear
testimony and advice in the manner that the members of the commission determine is the most
suitable for achieving its purpose. The commission shall hold at least five (5) public hearings across
the state to gather public input and inform citizens and legislators about the humanitarian and
environmental consequences of nuclear weapons use. These hearings shall address the potential
impact of a nuclear explosion on Providence or Quonset Point, including direct destruction,
radioactive fallout downwind, and long-term contamination. They shall also examine any potential
diplomatic breakthroughs such as entry into force of the Treaty on the A Prohibition of Nuclear
Weapons or other international diplomatic agreements aimed at reducing the threat of nuclear war.
The topics of employment, technologies, and industries within the state devoted to both nuclear
weapons and climate change shall be addressed. All members of the Rhode Island public shall be
given a reasonable opportunity to offer their views and ideas related to the subjects under
examination by the commission.
(h) If vacancies occur in the commission, the secretary of state shall fill them after
accepting applications as in the original appointments.
(i) The members of the special commission shall receive no compensation for their
services. The commission shall use state-owned public halls for the hearing venues without
necessity of payments. All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish such advice and
information, documentary and otherwise, to the commission and its agents as is deemed necessary
by the commission to facilitate the purpose of this section. The joint committee on legislative
services is hereby authorized and directed to provide suitable quarters for said commission.
(j) The commission shall report its findings and, if applicable, drafts of legislation to
implement them to the general assembly, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, and all members of the Rhode Island congressional legislation, as well as to the press and
general public, no later than August 6, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001950
========
LC001950 - Page 3 of 4